Washington statutes.
RCW 43.160.020

Definitions.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Board" means the community economic revitalization board.

(2) "Broadband" means a network of deployed telecommunications equipment and technologies necessary to provide high-speed internet access and other advanced telecommunications services.

(3) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(4) "Frontier county" means a county with a population density of fewer than 50 persons per square mile as determined by the office of financial management and published each year by the department. A county with a population density of 21 or fewer persons per square mile is a "frontier one" county. A county with a population density of more than 21 but fewer than 50 persons per square mile is a "frontier two" county. Every frontier county is also a rural county under this chapter and eligible for all benefits, services, and programs of a rural county unless a frontier county is specifically excluded in the authorizing statute.

(5) "Local government" or "political subdivision" means any port district, county, city, town, special purpose district, and any other municipal corporations or quasi-municipal corporations in the state providing for public facilities under this chapter.

(6) "Public facilities" means a project of a local government or a federally recognized Indian tribe for the planning, acquisition, construction, repair, reconstruction, replacement, rehabilitation, or improvement of: Bridges; roads; research, testing, training, and incubation facilities in areas designated as innovation partnership zones under RCW 43.330.270; buildings or structures; domestic and industrial water, earth stabilization, sanitary sewer, storm sewer, railroad, electricity, telecommunications, transportation, natural gas, and port facilities; all for the purpose of job creation, job retention, or job expansion.

(7) "Rural county" means a county with a population density of fewer than 100 persons per square mile or a county smaller than 225 square miles, as determined by the office of financial management and published each year by the department for the period July 1st to June 30th.

[ 2024 c 86 s 2; 2024 c 47 s 1; 2012 c 225 s 3; 2009 c 565 s 35. Prior: 2008 c 327 s 2; 2008 c 131 s 1; 2004 c 252 s 1; 1999 c 164 s 102; 1997 c 367 s 8; 1996 c 51 s 2; 1995 c 226 s 14; prior: 1993 c 320 s 1; 1993 c 280 s 55; 1992 c 21 s 3; 1991 c 314 s 22; 1985 c 466 s 58; 1985 c 6 s 12; 1984 c 257 s 2; 1983 1st ex.s. c 60 s 1; 1982 1st ex.s. c 40 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2024 c 47 s 1 and by 2024 c 86 s 2, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Findings—2024 c 86: See note following RCW 43.160.065.

Effective date—2008 c 327 ss 1, 2, 4-11, 17: See note following RCW 43.160.010.

Effective date—2008 c 131: "This act takes effect July 1, 2009." [ 2008 c 131 s 6.]

Findings—Intent—Part headings and subheadings not law—Effective date—Severability—1999 c 164: See notes following RCW 43.160.010.

Severability—1997 c 367: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1997 c 367 s 21.]

Conflict with federal requirements—1997 c 367: "If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. The rules under this act shall meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state." [ 1997 c 367 s 22.]

Effective date—1997 c 367: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 1997." [ 1997 c 367 s 23.]

Severability—Effective dates—1996 c 51: See notes following RCW 43.160.010.

Severability—1995 c 226: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1995 c 226 s 37.]

Conflict with federal requirements—1995 c 226: "If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements that are a prescribed condition to the allocation of federal funds to the state, the conflicting part of this act is inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and this finding does not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. The rules under this act shall meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition to the receipt of federal funds by the state." [ 1995 c 226 s 38.]

Effective date—1995 c 226: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1995." [ 1995 c 226 s 39.]

Effective date—1993 c 280: See RCW 43.330.902.

Findings—1991 c 314: "The legislature finds that:

(1) Cutbacks in allowable sales of old growth timber in Washington state pose a substantial threat to the region and the state with massive layoffs, loss of personal income, and declines in state revenues;

(2) The timber impact areas are of critical significance to the state because of their leading role in the overall economic well-being of the state and their importance to the quality of life to all residents of Washington, and that these regions require a special state effort to diversify the local economy;

(3) There are key opportunities to broaden the economic base in the timber impact areas including agriculture, high-technology, tourism, and regional exports; and

(4) A coordinated state, local, and private sector effort offers the greatest potential to promote economic diversification and to provide support for new projects within the region.

The legislature further finds that if a special state effort does not take place the decline in allowable timber sales may result in a loss of six thousand logging and milling jobs; two hundred million dollars in direct wages and benefits; twelve thousand indirect jobs; and three hundred million dollars in indirect wages and benefits.

It is the intent of the legislature to develop comprehensive programs to provide diversified economic development and promote job creation and employment opportunities for the citizens of the timber impact areas." [ 1991 c 314 s 1.]

Effective date—Severability—1985 c 466: See notes following RCW 43.31.125.